Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 21.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201077-1021
Redevelopment project, defined.

Redevelopment
project means a project proposed on a parcel or parcels previously developed
with real property improvements. Current usage cannot include agriculture
or livestock. The redevelopment project must be within the municipal limits
of a municipality. The existing improvements must be more than ten years old
or have been demolished prior to application.

Laws 2010, LB1018, § 21.